Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1108
Administrative office; arguments heard throughout state; judge's offices.

The Court of Appeals shall have its principal administrative office in Lincoln, Nebraska. The Court of Appeals shall hear arguments at sites throughout the state by designation of the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals. The Chief Judge shall give primary consideration to the convenience of the litigants and counsel when designating sites to hear arguments. Each judge of the Court of Appeals may maintain a principal office at any location in Nebraska and shall be entitled to staff as determined by the Supreme Court. The State Court Administrator shall make arrangements for office space and courtrooms to be used by the Court of Appeals.

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 8.